New York, session 2025-2026, S9633.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The insurance law is amended by adding a new section 2354 2 to read as follows: 3 § 2354. Bicycle delivery worker insurance personal injury liability 4 insurance. (a) As used in this section: 5 (1) "bicycle delivery contractor" means a person, corporation, part- 6 nership, sole proprietorship, or other entity that is operating in New 7 York state using a digital network to connect BEA delivery recipients to 8 bicycle with electric assist delivery workers; 9 (2) "digital network" means any website, mobile application, or other 10 internet service offered or utilized by a bicycle delivery contractor 11 that enables deliveries by bicycle with electric assist delivery work- 12 ers; 13 (3) "bicycle with electric assist delivery workers" or "BEA delivery 14 workers" means an individual who: 15 (i) receives connections to potential BEA delivery recipients and 16 related services through a digital network; and 17 (ii) uses a bicycle with electric assist as defined in section one 18 hundred two-c of the vehicle and traffic law or an electric scooter as 19 defined in section one hundred fourteen-e of the vehicle and traffic law 20 to offer or provide a prearranged delivery to BEA delivery recipients 21 through a digital network in exchange for compensation or payment of a 22 fee; 23 (4) "bicycle with electric assist delivery recipients" or "BEA deliv- 24 ery recipients" means a person or persons who use a digital network to 25 connect with a BEA delivery worker who provides delivery of food or 26 other items to points chosen by the BEA delivery recipient; and EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00726-10-6 S. 9633 2 1 (5) "bicycle delivery contractor prearranged trip" or "trip" means the 2 provision of delivery by a BEA delivery worker provided through the use 3 of a digital network: 4 (i) beginning when a BEA delivery worker accepts a BEA delivery recip- 5 ient's request for a delivery through a digital network; 6 (ii) continuing while the BEA delivery worker transports the requested 7 items on a bicycle with electric assist; and 8 (iii) ending when the last requested item is dropped off from the 9 bicycle with electric assist and marked as completed by a BEA delivery 10 worker on the digital network. 11 (b) (i) All bicycle delivery contractors must provide personal injury 12 liability insurance as defined in paragraph thirteen of subsection (a) 13 of section one thousand one hundred thirteen of this chapter to compen- 14 sate persons injured by a BEA delivery worker while such worker is 15 undergoing a trip, at no more than twenty thousand dollars per incident 16 involving a BEA delivery worker. 17 (ii) Insurance purchased through this policy will be primary over 18 other applicable insurance policies and shall not include no-fault 19 coverage. 20 (iii) The insurance policy must be written by an insurer licensed to 21 write insurance in this state or procured by a duly licensed excess line 22 broker pursuant to section two thousand one hundred eighteen of this 23 chapter. 24 (c) All bicycle delivery contractors must provide notice to BEA deliv- 25 ery workers that they provide personal injury liability insurance. A 26 bicycle delivery contractor must also post this notice on its website in 27 a prominent place and provide contact information for the department. 28 (d) The superintendent is authorized to promulgate such rules and 29 regulations to implement this section, including regulations to address 30 insurance coverage under this section when a BEA delivery worker uses 31 multiple digital networks simultaneously. 32 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 33 it shall have become a law.